en: Suitable for craft type: Crochet; Knitting; Knitting & crochet; Weaving; Other
it: Adatto per tipo di Craft: Uncinetto; Maglia; Maglia e uncinetto; Tessitura; Altro
tr: Uygun el işi türü: Tığ işi; Örgü; Örgü ve tığ işi; Dokuma; Diğer
hu: A következő kézműves tevékenységekhez alkalmas:: Horgolás; Kötés; Kötés és horgolás; Szövés; Egyéb
lt-LT: Tinka rankdarbių tipui: Nėrimas; Mezgimas; Mezgimas ir nėrimas; Audimas; Kita
sv: Lämplig för typ av hantverk: Virkning; Stickning; Stickning och virkning; Vävning; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo adequado para trabalhos manuais: Croché; Tricô; Tricô e croché; Tecelagem; Outro
pt-BR: Adequado para o tipo de artesanato: Crochê; Tricô; Tricô e crochê; Tecelagem; Outros
nb: Egnet for fartøystype: Hekling; Strikking; Strikking og hekling; Veving; Annet
ja: クラフトタイプに最適: かぎ針編み; 編み物; 編み物＆かぎ針編み; 織物; その他
cs: Vhodné pro typ řemeslné výroby: Háčkování; Pletení; Pletení a háčkování; Tkaní; Jiné
pl: Odpowiednie do typu rękodzieła: Szydełkowanie; Dzierganie; Dzierganie i szydełkowanie; Tkactwo; Inne
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto ročnega ustvarjanja: Kvačkanje; Pletenje; Pletenje in kvačkanje; Tkanje; Drugo
ru: Подходящие типы рукоделия: Вязание крючком; Вязание спицами; Вязание спицами и крючком; Ткачество; Другое
bg-BG: Подходящо за тип занаят: Плетене на една кука; Плетене на две куки; Плетене на две и една кука; Тъкане; Друго
fi: Soveltuu ompelutyypille: Virkkaus; Neulonta; Neulonta ja virkkaus; Kudonta; Muu
ko: 적합한 공예 유형: 코바늘 뜨개질; 대바늘 뜨개질; 대바늘 및 코바늘 뜨개질; 직조; 기타
zh-TW: 適用工藝類型: 鉤針編織; 棒針編織; 棒針和鉤針編織; 梭織; 其他
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de artizanat: Croșetare; Tricotare; Tricotare și croșetare; Țesere; Altele
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ plavidla: Háčkovanie; Pletenie; Pletenie a háčkovanie; Tkanie; Iné
th: เหมาะสำหรับงานฝีมือประเภทต่างๆ: โครเชต์; นิตติ้ง; นิตติ้งและโครเชต์; การทอ; อื่นๆ
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο χειροτεχνίας: Βελονάκι; Πλέξιμο; Πλέξιμο και βελονάκι; Ύφανση; Άλλο
de: Geeignet für Handarbeitstyp: Häkeln; Stricken; Stricken & Häkeln; Weben; Sonstige
fr: Convient pour les activités manuelles: Crochet; Tricot; Tricot et crochet; Tissage; Autre
vi: Phù hợp với loại hình thủ công: Móc len; Đan len; Đan & móc len; Dệt; Khác
hr-HR: Prikladno za vrstu izrade: Heklanje; Pletenje; Pletenje i heklanje; Tkanje; Ostalo
es: Adecuado para tipo de artesanía: Crochet; Tejido de punto; Tejido de punto y crochet; Tejido en telar; Otro
da: Egnet håndarbejdstype: Hækling; Strik; Strik og hækling; Vævning; Andet
nl: Geschikt voor type handwerk: Haken; Breien; Breien en haken; Weven; Overig
zh-CN: 适用手工类型: 钩织; 针织; 针织和钩织; 编织; 其他